bg-BG: Превозни средства и части > Автомобилни части и аксесоари > Части и аксесоари за плавателни съдове > Горивни системи за плавателни съдове: Филтри за гориво и водоотделители за плавателни съдове; Фитинги и конектори за гориво за плавателни съдове; Горивни маркучи и тръби за плавателни съдове; Нивомери за гориво за плавателни съдове; Горивни помпи и части за плавателни съдове; Резервоари за гориво и части за плавателни съдове
el: Οχήματα & ανταλλακτικά > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ οχημάτων > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ για σκάφη > Συστήματα καυσίμου σκαφών: Φίλτρα καυσίμου και υδατοπαγίδες σκαφών; Εξαρτήματα και σύνδεσμοι καυσίμου σκαφών; Σωληνώσεις καυσίμου και ανταλλακτικά σκαφών; Μετρητές καυσίμων σκαφών; Αντλίες & ανταλλακτικά καυσίμων σκαφών; Δεξαμενές & ανταλλακτικά καυσίμων σκαφών
sk-SK: Diely pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre plavidlá > Palivové systémy plavidiel: Palivové filtre a odlučovače vody pre plavidlá; Palivové armatúry a konektory pre plavidlá; Palivové potrubia a diely pre plavidlá; Palivomery na plavidlách; Palivové čerpadlá a diely pre plavidlá; Palivové nádrže a diely pre plavidlá
en: Vehicles & Parts > Vehicle Parts & Accessories > Watercraft Parts & Accessories > Watercraft Fuel Systems: Watercraft Fuel Filters & Water Separators; Watercraft Fuel Fittings & Connectors; Watercraft Fuel Lines & Parts; Watercraft Fuel Meters; Watercraft Fuel Pumps & Parts; Watercraft Fuel Tanks & Parts
pl: Pojazdy i części > Akcesoria i części do pojazdów > Części i akcesoria do jednostek pływających > Układy paliwowe do jednostek pływających: Filtry paliwa i separatory wody do jednostek pływających; Złączki i przyłącza paliwowe do jednostek pływających; Przewody paliwowe do jednostek pływających; Wskaźniki poziomu paliwa do jednostek pływających; Pompy paliwa do jednostek pływających; Zbiorniki na paliwo do jednostek pływających i ich części
ko: 차량/부품 > 차량 부품/부대용품 > 선박 부품/부대용품 > 선박 연료 장치: 수상 기구 연료 필터 및 수분 분리기; 수상 기구 연료 피팅 및 커넥터; 선박 연료 라인/부품; 선박 연료 게이지; 선박 연료 펌프/부품; 선박 연료 탱크/부품
zh-TW: 車輛與零配件 > 車輛零件/配件 > 船艇零件/配件 > 船艇燃料系統: 水上載具燃油濾清器與油水分離器; 水上載具燃油接頭與連接器; 船艇油箱管路和零件; 船用燃料計; 船艇汽油幫浦/零件; 船艇用油箱和零件
pt-PT: Veículos e peças > Acessórios e peças para veículos > Acessórios e peças para embarcações > Sistemas de combustível para embarcações: Filtros de combustível e separadores de água para embarcações; Acessórios e conectores de combustível para embarcações; Peças e linhas de combustível para embarcações; Indicadores de combustível para embarcações; Peças e bombas de combustível para embarcações; Peças e depósitos de combustível para embarcações
hu: Járművek és alkatrészek > Járműalkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Vízijármű-alkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Vízijárműüzemanyag-rendszerek: Vízijármű-üzemanyagszűrők és vízleválasztók; Vízijárművek üzemanyag-csatlakozói és szerelvényei; Vízijárműüzemanyag-vezetékek és -alkatrészek; Vízijárműüzemanyag-mérők; Vízijárműüzemanyag-pumpák és -alkatrészek; Vízijárműüzemanyag-tartályok és -alkatrészek
sl-SI: Vozila in deli > Deli in dodatki za vozila > Deli in dodatki za vodna plovila > Sistemi za gorivo za vodna plovila: Filtri za gorivo in ločevalniki vode za plovila; Gorivni priključki za plovila; Cevi za gorivo in deli za vodna plovila; Merilniki goriva za vodna plovila; Črpalke in deli za gorivo za vodna plovila; Rezervoarji in deli za gorivo za vodna plovila
ja: 乗り物・パーツ > 乗り物用パーツ・関連用品 > 船舶パーツ・関連用品 > 船舶燃料系: ウォータークラフト用フューエルフィルター・ウォーターセパレーター; ウォータークラフト用フューエルフィッティング・コネクター; 船舶燃料経路・関連パーツ; 船舶燃料メーター; 船舶用燃料ポンプ・関連パーツ; 船舶用燃料タンク・関連パーツ
ru: Транспортные средства, запчасти и аксессуары > Запчасти и аксессуары для транспортных средств > Запчасти и аксессуары для водного транспорта > Топливные системы водного транспорта: Топливные фильтры и влагоотделители для водного транспорта; Топливные фитинги и коннекторы для водного транспорта; Топливопроводы для водного транспорта и их детали; Указатели уровня топлива для водного транспорта; Топливные насосы для водного транспорта и их детали; Топливные баки для водного транспорта и их детали
tr: Taşıtlar ve Parçalar > Taşıt Parçaları ve Aksesuarlar > Su Jetli Tekne Parçaları ve Aksesuarları > Tekne Yakıt Sistemleri: Deniz aracı yakıt filtreleri ve su ayırıcıları; Deniz aracı yakıt bağlantı parçaları ve bağlayıcıları; Tekne Kabloları ve Parçaları; Tekne Yakıt Göstergeleri; Tekne Yakıt Pompaları ve Parçaları; Tekne Yakıt Tankları ve Parçaları
nl: Voertuigen en onderdelen > Voertuigonderdelen en -accessoires > Onderdelen en accessoirs voor vaartuigen > Brandstofsystemen voor vaartuigen: Brandstoffilters en -waterscheiders voor vaartuigen; Brandstoffittingen en -aansluitingen voor vaartuigen; Brandstofleidingen en onderdelen voor vaartuigen; Brandstofmeters voor vaartuigen; Brandstofpompen en onderdelen voor vaartuigen; Brandstoftanks en onderdelen voor vaartuigen
es: Vehículos y recambios > Piezas y accesorios para vehículos > Accesorios y piezas para embarcaciones > Sistemas de combustible para embarcaciones: Filtros de combustible y separadores de agua para embarcaciones; Conexiones y conectores de combustible para embarcaciones; Piezas y líneas de combustible para embarcaciones; Medidores de combustible para embarcaciones; Piezas y bombas de combustible para embarcaciones; Piezas y depósitos de combustible para embarcaciones
it: Veicoli e parti > Componenti e accessori per auto > Parti e accessori imbarcazioni > Impianti carburante imbarcazioni: Filtri del carburante e separatori d'acqua per natanti; Raccordi e connettori per carburante per natanti; Linee carburante e parti imbarcazioni; Indicatori livello carburante imbarcazioni; Pompe carburante e parti imbarcazioni; Serbatoi carburante e parti imbarcazioni
da: Køretøjer og dele > Dele og tilbehør til køretøjer > Dele og tilbehør til fartøjer > Brændstofsystemer til fartøjer: Brændstoffiltre og vandudskillere til fartøjer; Brændstoffittings og stik til fartøjer; Brændstofledninger og dele til fartøjer; Brændstofmålere til fartøjer; Brændstofpumper og dele til fartøjer; Brændstoftanke og dele til fartøjer
de: Fahrzeuge & Teile > Fahrzeugersatzteile & -zubehör > Wasserfahrzeugteile & Zubehör > Kraftstoffsysteme für Wasserfahrzeuge: Kraftstofffilter & Wasserabscheider für Wasserfahrzeuge; Kraftstoffanschlüsse & -verbindungen für Wasserfahrzeuge; Kraftstoffleitungen & Teile für Wasserfahrzeuge; Benzinuhren für Wasserfahrzeuge; Kraftstoffpumpen & Teile für Wasserfahrzeuge; Kraftstofftanks & Teile für Wasserfahrzeuge
zh-CN: 交通工具/汽车/飞机/船舶 > 交通工具零件/配件 > 船艇零件/配件 > 船舶燃油系统: 船舶燃油滤清器和油水分离器; 船舶燃油配件和连接器; 船舶燃料线/零件; 船舶油量表; 游艇油泵与零件; 船舶油箱与零件
hr-HR: Vozila i dijelovi vozila > Dijelovi i oprema za vozila > Dijelovi i dodaci za plovila > Sustavi goriva za plovila: Filtri za gorivo i separatori vode za plovila; Priključci i spojnice za gorivo za plovila; Cijevi za gorivo i dijelovi za plovila; Mjerači goriva za plovila; Pumpe za gorivo i dijelovi za plovila; Rezervoari za gorivo i dijelovi za plovila
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės ir dalys > Transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Vandens transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Vandens transporto priemonių degalų sistemos: Vandens transporto priemonių kuro filtrai ir vandens separatoriai; Vandens transporto priemonių kuro jungtys ir jungiamieji elementai; Vandens transporto priemonių degalų vamzdeliai ir dalys; Vandens transporto priemonių degalų matuokliai; Vandens transporto priemonių degalų siurbliai ir dalys; Vandens transporto priemonių degalų bakai ir dalys
th: รถยนต์และชิ้นส่วน > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์สำหรับยานยนต์ > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์เรือ > ระบบเชื้อเพลิงของเรือ: กรองน้ำมันเชื้อเพลิงและดักน้ำเรือ; ข้อต่อและหัวต่อท่อน้ำมันเชื้อเพลิงเรือ; ท่อส่งและชิ้นส่วนเชื้อเพลิงของเรือ; มิเตอร์เชื้อเพลิงเรือ; ปั๊มและชิ้นส่วนเชื้อเพลิงสำหรับเรือ; ชิ้นส่วนและถังน้ำมันเรือ
nb: Kjøretøy og deler > Deler og tilbehør til kjøretøy > Båtdeler og -tilbehør > Bensinsystemer for båt: Drivstoffiltre og vannutskillere for vannfartøy; Drivstoffkoblinger og -kontakter for vannfartøy; Bensinrør og deler for båt; Bensinmålere for båt; Bensinpumper og deler for båt; Bensintanker og deler for båt
sv: Fordon och delar > Fordonsdelar och tillbehör > Delar och tillbehör till fartyg > Bränslesystem för fartyg: Bränslefilter och vattenavskiljare för sjöfarkoster; Bränslekopplingar och anslutningar för sjöfarkoster; Bränsleslangar och delar för fartyg; Bränslemätare för fartyg; Bränslepumpar och delar för fartyg; Bränsletankar och delar för fartyg
pt-BR: Veículos e peças > Peças e acessórios de veículos > Peças e acessórios para embarcações > Sistemas de combustível de embarcações: Filtros de combustível e separadores de água para embarcações; Conexões e conectores de combustível para embarcações; Linhas de combustível de embarcações; Medidores de combustíveis de embarcações; Bombas de combustível peças de embarcações; Tanques de combustível e peças de embarcações
cs: Vozidla a náhradní díly > Díly a příslušenství vozidel > Díly a příslušenství k motorovým člunům > Palivové systémy motorových člunů: Palivové filtry a separátory vody pro plavidla; Palivové fitinky a konektory pro plavidla; Palivové potrubí motorových člunů a jeho součásti; Palivoměry motorových člunů; Palivová čerpadla motorových člunů a jejich součásti; Palivové nádrže motorových člunů a jejich součásti
fi: Ajoneuvot ja osat > Ajoneuvojen osat ja tarvikkeet > Veneen osat ja tarvikkeet > Veneen polttoainejärjestelmät: Vesikulkuneuvojen polttoainesuodattimet ja vedenerottimet; Vesikulkuneuvojen polttoaineliittimet ja kiinnikkeet; Veneen polttoaineletkut ja osat; Veneen polttoainemittarit; Veneen polttoainepumput ja osat; Veneen polttoainetankit ja osat
fr: Véhicules et accessoires > Pièces détachées pour véhicules > Pièces détachées et accessoires nautiques > Systèmes d'alimentation pour bateaux: Filtres à carburant et séparateurs d’eau pour embarcations; Raccords et connecteurs de carburant pour embarcations; Conduites de carburant et pièces détachées; Jauges de carburant pour bateaux; Pompes à carburant et pièces détachées; Réservoirs et pièces détachées
ro-RO: Vehicule și piese > Piese și accesorii pentru vehicule > Piese și accesorii pentru ambarcațiuni > Sisteme combustibil ambarcațiuni: Filtre de combustibil și separatoare de apă pentru ambarcațiuni; Racorduri și conectori de combustibil pentru ambarcațiuni; Conducte de combustibil și piese pentru ambarcațiuni; Contoare de combustibil pentru ambarcațiuni; Pompe de combustibil și piese pentru ambarcațiuni; Rezervoare de combustibil și piese pentru ambarcațiuni
vi: Xe và phụ tùng > Bộ phận và phụ kiện xe cộ > Bộ phận & linh kiện tàu thuyền > Hệ thống nhiên liệu tàu thuyền: Bộ lọc nhiên liệu và bộ tách nước phương tiện đường thủy; Đầu nối và khớp nối nhiên liệu phương tiện đường thủy; Đường ống dẫn nhiên liệu; Đồng hồ đo nhiên liệu cho tàu thuyền; Bơm nhiên liệu & phụ tùng tàu thủy; Phụ tùng và thùng chứa nhiên liệu tàu thủy